Hawaii statutes.
§26-19 Department of transportation.
The department of transportation shall be headed by a single executive to be
known as the director of transportation. The department shall establish,
maintain, and operate transportation facilities of the State, including
highways, airports, harbors, and such other transportation facilities and
activities as may be authorized by law.

The department shall plan, develop, promote,
and coordinate various transportation systems management programs that shall
include, but not be limited to, alternate work and school hours programs,
bicycling programs, and ridesharing programs.

The department shall develop and promote
ridesharing programs which shall include but not be limited to, carpool and
vanpool programs, and may assist organizations interested in promoting similar
programs, arrange for contracts with private organizations to manage and
operate these programs, and assist in the formulation of ridesharing
arrangements. Ridesharing programs include informal arrangements in which two
or more persons ride together in a motor vehicle.

The functions and authority heretofore
exercised by the department of public works with respect to highways are
transferred to the department of transportation established by this chapter.

On July 1, 1961, the Hawaii aeronautics
commission, the board of harbor commissioners and the highway commission shall
be abolished and their remaining functions, duties, and powers shall be
transferred to the department of transportation. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §26; Supp,
§14A-25; HRS §26-19; am L 1980, c 220, §§1, 2; am L 1981, c 140, §1; am L 1983,
c 43, §1; am L 1984, c 233, §1; am L 1989, c 31, §2; am L 1993, c 224, §§2, 6;
am L 1995, c 25, §1; am L 1997, c 309, §4; am L 2013, c 285, §1]

Note

City and county of Honolulu to take ownership of specified
road or parcel upon acceptance of funds. L 2016, c 194, §4.

Interisland and intra-island ferry system feasibility study;
report to 2018 legislature. L 2016, c 196.

Public land trust information system. L 2011, c 54; L 2013,
c 110.

Roads commission; private roads disputes; reports to
2018-2019 legislature (ceases to exist on June 30, 2018). L 2016, c 194, §2.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next